src-fst-morphology-stems-verbs.lexc.md
# Norwegian Bokmål verb stems

This file documents the Bokmål verb stem file [stems/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-nob/blob/main/src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc).

## Overview of the declension classes

----------------------------------------------------
Main types, from Bokmålsordboka

v1 kaste kaster kasta kasta
kastet kastet
v2 lyse lyser lyste lyst
reparere reparerer reparerte reparert
v3 leve lever levde levd
v4 nå når nådde nådd
v4 bie bier bidde bidd

Subtypes
v12 v1 or v2
v13 v1 or v3
v1-s passive v1 verbs
v2-s passive v2 verbs
v3-s passive v3 verbs
Strong verbs have verb-specific lexica

## The entries

LEXICON VerbRoot contains the 5700 or so  verbs

* innbefatte v1 ; 
* tilslutte v1 ; 

* abbreviere v2 ; 
* abdisere v2 ; 
* allmenngjøre:allmenn GJØRE ; 
* anbringe:an BRINGE ; 
* andøve v3 ; 
* anfalle:an FALLE ; 
* angi:an GI ; 
* angripe:an GRIPE ; 
* ankomme:an KOMME ;  
* falle: FALLE ; 
* etc.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-nob/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
